District of Columbia statutes.
47-709

Sale of federal property.

It shall be the duty of the Administrator of General Services, within 90 days after the sale of any lots or squares belonging to the United States in the City of Washington, to report the fact to the proper officers of the District, giving the date of sale, the number of the lot and square, and the name of the purchaser; and such lots or squares shall be liable to taxation by the District from the day of sale.

History

R.S., D.C., § 143
Feb. 26, 1925, 43 Stat. 983, ch. 339, § 3
Mar. 2, 1934, 48 Stat. 389, ch. 38, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Business improvement districts, “assessed value” defined, see § 2-1215.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-709.
1973 Ed., § 47-409.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-213 validated a previously made technical correction in the table of contents.

Transfer of Functions

The Office of Public Buildings and Grounds under the direction of the Chief of Engineers of the Army was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Director of Public Buildings and Public Grounds of the National Capital by the Act of February 26, 1925, 43 Stat. 983, ch. 339, § 3. The latter agency was abolished and its functions transferred to the Office of National Parks, Buildings, and Reservations by Executive Order 6166, June 10, 1933. Act of March 2, 1934, 48 Stat. 389, ch. 38, § 1, provided that the Office of National Parks, Buildings, and Reservations would be known as the National Park Service. The functions of the National Park Service in the District of Columbia regarding public buildings were transferred to the Public Buildings Administration by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1939. The Public Buildings Administration was abolished and its functions subsequently transferred to the Administrator of General Services by §§ 1 and 2 of Reorganization Plan No. 18 of 1950.